Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Chapter 27 Psychology and Behavior Analysts

History.

2022 ch. 47, § 1, effective March 9, 2022.

Cross references. —

As to licensing provisions generally, see chapter 1 of this title.

As to physicians and surgeons generally, see chapter 26 of this title.

Declaration of policy. —

Laws 1993, ch. 182, § 4, provides: “The practice of psychology or school psychology in the state of Wyoming is hereby declared to affect the public health, safety and welfare, and to be subject to regulation for the protection of the public from the practice of psychology or school psychology by unqualified persons and from unprofessional conduct by persons licensed to practice psychology or school psychology.”

Stated

in

Paravecchio v. Memorial Hosp., 742 P.2d 1276,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 507

(Wyo. 1987).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Regulation of psychologists, 81 ALR2d 791.

Liability of doctor, psychiatrist or psychologist for failure to take steps to prevent patient's suicide, 17 ALR4th 1128.

§§ 33-27-101 through 33-27-112.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 182, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

Former §§

33-27-101

through 33-27-112, which derived from Laws 1965, ch. 102 §§ 1 through 12, related to the licensing of psychologists. For present similar provisions, see §§

33-27-113

through

33-27-123

.

§ 33-27-113.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Board” means the Wyoming state board of psychology;

“Institution of higher education” means any regionally accredited institution of higher education in the United States, including a professional school, that offers a full-time doctoral course of study in psychology as defined in the rules of the board. For Canadian universities, it means an institution of higher education that holds recognized membership in the association of universities and colleges of Canada. Institutions of higher education outside the United States and Canada will be evaluated on a case-by-case basis by the board;

“Practice of psychology” means the observation, description, evaluation, interpretation and modification of human behavior by the application of psychological principles, methods and procedures, for the purpose of any one (1) or any combination of the following:

Preventing, eliminating, evaluating or assessing symptomatic, maladaptive or undesired behavior;

Enhancing interpersonal relationships, work and life adjustment, personal effectiveness, behavioral health and mental health;

Consulting in legal decision making;

Psychological testing and the evaluation or assessment of personal characteristics such as intelligence, personality, abilities, interests, aptitudes and neuropsychological functioning;

Psychoanalysis, psychotherapy, hypnosis, biofeedback and behavior analysis and therapy;

Diagnosis and treatment of mental and emotional disorder or disability, alcoholism and substance abuse, disorders of habit or conduct, as well as of psychological aspects of physical illness, accident, injury or disability;

Psychoeducational evaluation, therapy, remediation and consultation.

“Practice of school psychology” means rendering or offering to render to individuals, groups, organizations, government agencies or the public any of the following services:

Evaluation, diagnosis, or test interpretation limited to assessment of intellectual ability, learning patterns, achievement, motivation, personality or neurological factors directly related to learning problems in an educational setting;

Counseling services for children or adults for amelioration or prevention of educationally related learning problems.

“Psychologist” means a person licensed to practice psychology;

“Representation as a psychologist or school psychologist” means using any title or description of services incorporating the words psychology, psychological or psychologist;

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 154, § 2.

“Sexual exploitation of a client or patient” means:

Any verbal behavior by a psychologist or school psychologist which involves offers of exchange of professional services for some form of sexual gratification; or

Unlawful or unprofessional sexual contact with a client or patient.

“Specialist in school psychology” means a person who holds at least a masters degree in school psychology or a degree considered equivalent by the board as described in the rules and regulations and who is certified by the board;

“Certifying entity” means the behavior analyst certification board or another entity as specified by rule of the board whose programs to credential practitioners of behavior analysis are accredited by the national commission on certifying agencies, the American national standards institute or a similar successor accrediting organization and which reasonably ensures that persons certified have the qualifications, education and experience necessary to protect public health and safety and to provide services that are customary and professional;

“Licensed assistant behavior analyst” means a person licensed under this act for the practice of behavior analysis and who is supervised in accordance with W.S. 33-27-124(c);

“Licensed behavior analyst” means a person licensed under this act for the practice of behavior analysis;

“Practice of behavior analysis” means the design, implementation and evaluation of instructional and environmental modifications based on scientific research and direct and indirect observation and measurement of behavior and environment to produce socially significant improvements in human behavior. The “practice of behavior analysis” includes the empirical identification of functional relations between behavior and environmental factors. The “practice of behavior analysis” does not include psychotherapy, cognitive therapy, psychoanalysis, hypnotherapy, counseling, psychological testing, personality, intellectual or neuropsychological assessments or the diagnosis of psychological disorders;

“This act” means W.S.

33-27-113

through

33-27-125

.

A person not otherwise exempt from this act is engaged in the practice of psychology when the person advertises or represents that he is authorized to practice psychology and performs any of the activities enumerated in paragraph (a)(iii) of this section without regard to whether payment is received for services rendered.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 182, § 1; 2009, ch. 154, §§ 1, 2; 2022 ch. 47, § 2, effective March 9, 2022.

The 2022 amendment

added (a)(x) through (a)(xiii); redesignated former (a)(x) as (a)(xiv); and substituted “33-27-125” for “33-27-123” in present (a)(xiv).

Laws 2022, ch. 47, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 9, 2022.

Cross references. —

As to privileged communication by a licensed or certified mental health professional, see §

33-38-113

.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a)(iii), inserted “any one (1) or any combination of the following” following “for the purpose of”, designated the existing provisions beginning with “Preventing” as present (a)(iii)(A), and designated the existing provisions beginning with “Enhancing” as present (a)(iii)(B);
substituted “eliminating, evaluating or assessing” for “or eliminating” in (a)(iii)(A); deleted the former second and third sentences of (a)(iii)(B), which read: “Psychological services may be rendered to individuals, families, groups and the public.
The practice of psychology shall be construed within the meaning of this definition without regard to whether payment is received for services rendered.
The practice of psychology includes, but is not limited to”; added present (a)(iii)(C); redesignated former (a)(iii)(A) through (a)(iii)(D) as present (a)(iii)(D) through (a)(iii)(G); repealed former (a)(vii), which read: “ ‘School psychologist’ means a person who holds a doctoral degree as defined in the rules and regulations who is licensed to practice school psychology” and redesignated the remaining paragraphs accordingly; and added (b).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Emotional or psychological “blocking” or repression as tolling running of statute of limitations, 11 ALR5th 588.

§ 33-27-114.
Exemptions; psychology.

Nothing in this act shall be construed to prevent members of other recognized professions who are licensed, certified or regulated under the laws of this state as defined in the rules and regulations from rendering services consistent with their professional training and code of ethics, provided that they do not represent themselves to be psychologists.

Individuals who have been certified as school psychologists by the Wyoming professional teaching standards board shall be permitted to use the terms “school psychologist” or “certified school psychologist” within the school setting. Those persons shall be restricted in their practice to employment within schools and educational institutions and those settings under the purview of the professional teaching standards board unless they are also licensed under this act or licensed under W.S.

33-38-101

through

33-38-110

.

Duly recognized members of the clergy shall not be restricted from functioning in their ministerial capacity, provided they do not represent themselves to be psychologists.

Nothing in this act shall be construed to prevent the teaching of psychology, the conducting of psychological research, or the provision of industrial or organizational consultation provided that such teaching, research or consultation does not involve the delivery or supervision of direct psychological services to individuals who are themselves rather than a third party the intended beneficiaries of the services without regard to the source or extent of payment for services rendered. Nothing in this act shall prevent the provision of expert testimony by psychologists who are exempted by this act. Persons holding an earned doctoral degree in psychology from an institution of higher education may use the title “psychologist” in conjunction with the activities permitted in this subsection.

Nothing in this act shall be construed to prevent the persons described in this subsection from engaging in activities defined as the practice of psychology, provided that the persons shall not represent themselves by the title “psychologist.” The persons may use the terms “psychological trainee,” “psychological intern,” “psychological resident” or “psychological practitioner” and shall perform their activities under the supervision and responsibility of a licensed psychologist in accordance with the rules promulgated by the board. This subsection shall only apply to:

A matriculated graduate student in psychology whose activities constitute a part of the course of study for a graduate degree in psychology at an institution of higher education;

An individual pursuing postdoctoral training or experience in psychology, including persons seeking to fulfill the requirements for licensure under the provisions of this act; or

A qualified practitioner holding a master’s degree or doctoral degree in psychology from a program approved by the board while working under the supervision of a licensed psychologist. The board, in its rules and regulations, shall establish:

The qualifications for use of the title “psychological practitioner”;

The number of practitioners that a psychologist may employ;

Conditions under which they may practice;

The process of certification with the board; and

Appropriate fees.

Nothing in this act shall be construed to prevent specialists in school psychology from engaging in activities defined as the practice of school psychology, provided that they shall not represent themselves by the title “psychologist.” These persons may perform their activities under the supervision and responsibility of a psychologist in accordance with the rules promulgated by the board. The board, in its rules and regulations, shall establish:

Qualifications for use of the title “specialist in school psychology”;

The number of specialists that a psychologist may employ;

Conditions under which they may be supervised or practice;

The process of certification with the board; and

Appropriate fees.

Nothing in this act may be construed to require employees or contractors of a state agency to be licensed under this act in order to perform their official duties related to the evaluation, auditing or designing of programs, provided those employees or contractors do not hold themselves out to be psychologists.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 182, § 1; 1994, ch. 17, § 1; 2009, ch. 154, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “or school psychologists” at the end of (a); substituted “master’s degree” for “masters degree” in the first sentence of (e)(iii); in the introductory language of (f), deleted “school” following “by the title” and deleted “or school psychologist” following “of a psychologist”; deleted “or school psychologist” preceding “may employ” in (f)(ii); and added (g).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-27-113(a)(x).

§ 33-27-115.
State board of psychology.

The Wyoming state board of psychology shall consist of six (6) licensed psychologists, two (2) licensed behavior analysts, and one (1) public member appointed by the governor. Each member shall be a resident of this state. Each member who is a psychologist shall be licensed under this act and shall have a minimum of three (3) years of post-licensure experience. At least one (1) member who is a psychologist shall be engaged full time in the doctoral teaching and training of psychologists, and at least two (2) members who are psychologists shall be engaged full time in the professional practice of psychology. Each member who is a behavior analyst shall be licensed under this act and shall have a minimum of three (3) years of post-licensure experience, except as provided by subsection (c) of this section. The composition of the board shall to the greatest extent practicable represent both the public and private sectors of the practices of psychology and behavior analysis. Public members shall not be psychologists, behavior analysts, assistant behavior analysts, applicants or former applicants for licensure or certification under this act, members of another health profession, or members of a household that includes a person licensed or certified under this act. Board members shall be appointed who are free from conflict of interest in performing the duties of the board.

Before making appointment to the board, the governor shall solicit a list of nominations from the Wyoming psychological association but is not limited to appointing board members from that list. The appointments shall be with the advice and consent of the senate in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

through

28-12-103

.

The term of office shall be five (5) years with provision for reappointment for one (1) additional term. A member may be reappointed for an additional two (2) terms after at least two (2) years off the board. The two (2) members of the board who are required to be licensed behavior analysts shall have staggered terms. One (1) behavior analyst member shall be appointed for five (5) years and one (1) behavior analyst member shall be appointed for three (3) years. Notwithstanding the requirements under subsection (a) of this section, the initial two (2) behavior analyst members appointed to the board by the governor shall not be required to be licensed in this state before their appointment but shall obtain licensure during their board tenure in order to be reappointed as a board member and shall otherwise be qualified to practice behavior analysis under this act.

through (iv) Repealed by Laws 2022, ch. 47, § 3.

The governor may remove any board member pursuant to W.S.

9-1-202

. Any vacancy in the membership of the board occurring other than by expiration of term shall be filled by appointment by the governor for the unexpired term.

Board members shall serve without compensation other than per diem and mileage as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii).

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 182, § 1; 2009, ch. 154, § 1; 2014 ch. 69, § 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2022 ch. 47, §§ 2, 3, effective March 9, 2022.

Cross references. —

As to meal, lodging and mileage allowances for state employees, see §

9-3-102

.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a), substituted “six (6)” for “five (5)” and deleted “one (1) school psychologist” following “licensed psychologists” in the first sentence, deleted “or school psychologist” preceding “shall be licensed” and deleted “except the first school psychologist shall have a minimum of five (5) years professional experience” from the end of the second sentence, deleted “initial” preceding “psychological practitioner” and deleted “five (5) years of professional experience and each succeeding psychological practitioner member shall have a minimum of” preceding “three (3) years” in the fourth sentence, and deleted “school psychologists” preceding “psychological practitioners” in the fifth sentence.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in (e), substituted “as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii)” for “allowance as allowed to state employees for the performance of their duties.”

The 2022 amendment

by ch. 46, §§ 2, 3, in (a), in the first sentence, substituted “two (2) licensed behavior analysts” for “one (1) psychological practitioner” and “one (1) public member” for “two (2) public members,” rewrote the fifth sentence, which read, “The psychological practitioner shall have a minimum of three (3) years post-certification experience,” in the sixth sentence, added “to the greatest extent practicable,” substituted “practices” for “practice,” added “and behavior analysis,” substituted “behavior analysts, assistant behavior analysts” for “psychological practitioners” in the seventh sentence; in (c), in the third sentence, added “two (2) members of the”, substituted “who are required to be licensed behavior analysts” for “as first constituted,” deleted “as follows” at the end, added the fourth and fifth sentences; and repealed former (c)(i) through (c)(iv), which read, “(i) Three (3) members, one (1) of whom is a public member, appointed for five (5) years; (ii) Three (3) members appointed for four (4) years; (iii) Two (2) members appointed for three (3) years; and (iv) One (1) member appointed for two (2) years.”

Laws 2022, ch. 47, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 9, 2022.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 154, § 3, provides: “The term of the person representing school psychologists on the Wyoming state board of psychology shall continue pursuant to the terms of his gubernatorial appointment and the person shall not be reappointed unless the person otherwise qualifies for appointment as provided in W.S.

33-27-115

, as amended by this act.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-27-113(a)(x).

§ 33-27-116.
Powers and duties of the board.

In accordance with this act and rules and regulations promulgated under it, the board shall determine a person’s initial and continuing qualifications and fitness to practice psychology or behavior analysis, proceed against the unlawful and unlicensed practice of psychology or behavior analysis and otherwise enforce this act.

The board shall adopt rules in accordance with the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act which are reasonable and necessary to administer this act. The powers conferred on the board by this act shall be liberally construed to protect the health, safety and the welfare of the people of this state.

The board shall hold a regular annual meeting in which it shall select from its members a chair and a vice-chair. The secretary of the board shall be appointed by the board from its membership. A quorum of the board shall consist of the majority of its members at any meeting.

Other regular meetings shall be held at such times as the rules of the board may provide. Special meetings may be held at such times as may be deemed necessary or advisable by the chair or the majority of board members or upon request of the governor. Reasonable notice of all meetings shall be given in the manner prescribed by the board.

The board shall, as required by W.S.

9-2-1014

, report to the governor concerning the work of the board.

The board shall establish reasonable fees from the issuance and renewal of licenses, certificates and its other services in its rules promulgated in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act as specified in W.S.

33-1-201

.

The board may accept grants and gifts from individuals, associations, corporations, foundations and institutions to carry on its functions.

The board shall adopt an official seal.

The board may require continuing education on the part of those persons licensed or certified under this act to qualify for renewal, the terms of which shall be specified in the rules and regulations.

Each year the board shall publish a list of all persons licensed or certified under this act and a copy of that list will be made available for the public at the board’s office.

A member of the board or any employee or agent of the board shall not be held civilly liable for any act performed in good faith and within the scope of the duties of the board.

The board may employ or contract with an executive secretary and other necessary staff. The executive secretary shall not be a member of the board. The board may set the salary for the executive secretary.

The board shall request criminal history background information as authorized under W.S. 7-19-106(a)(xxxvii) for all initial applicants and all renewal applicants every two (2) years as provided by rule of the board.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 182, § 1; 2009, ch. 154, § 1; 2022 ch. 47, § 2, effective March 9, 2022.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a), deleted “or school psychology” following “fitness to practice psychology” and following “unlicensed practice of psychology” and deleted the second sentence, which read: “The board may employ necessary personnel”; and added (n).

The 2022 amendment

added “or behavior analysis” following “psychology” twice in (a); and added (o).

Laws 2022, ch. 47, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 9, 2022.

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

Wyoming Administrative Procedures Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-27-113(a)(x).

§ 33-27-117.
Requirements for licensure; psychology.

The board shall issue a license as a psychologist to any applicant who files an application upon a form and in a manner as prescribed by the board, accompanied by the appropriate fee and who furnishes satisfactory evidence to the board of the applicant’s competence and of the following which evidence shall comply with rules and regulations of the board:

Repealed by Laws 2022, ch. 47, § 3.

The applicant’s receipt of a doctoral degree from a program of graduate study in psychology as defined in the rules and regulations, awarded by an institution of higher education;

The applicant’s completion of two (2) years of supervised professional experience which may be completed prior and subsequent to the granting of the degree required under paragraph (ii) of this subsection;

The applicant’s successful completion of the examination for professional practice in psychology and any other written or oral examinations prescribed by the board. The acceptable level of performance for all examinations and policies regarding reexamination of failed applicants shall be determined by the board.

The board may waive any examination if a psychologist has been licensed in another jurisdiction and if the requirements for licensure in that jurisdiction are equal to, or exceed, the requirements for licensure in this state.

A person licensed as a psychologist or school psychologist in this state on June 30, 2009 shall be deemed to have met all requirements for licensure under this act and shall be eligible for renewal of licensure as a psychologist in accordance with this act.

The board may issue a provisional license to an applicant who does not meet all the requirements in this section if the board finds that:

A need for psychological services exists in a rural part of Wyoming; and

The applicant is employed by a state or community mental health center.

The board may issue a temporary license to an applicant who is licensed or certified by a board of psychology of another United States state or territory, or of a foreign country or province whose standards are equal to or exceed the requirements for licensure as a psychologist in this state. A temporary licensee may offer services as a psychologist in this state for not more than thirty (30) working days in any year without holding a permanent license issued under this act. The temporary licensee shall report the nature and extent of the licensee’s practice in this state to the board if that practice exceeds twenty (20) working days in any one (1) calendar year.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 182, § 1; 2009, ch. 154, § 1; 2022 ch. 47, §§ 2, 3, effective March 9, 2022.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “or school psychologist, as appropriate” following “as a psychologist” in the introductory language of (a); substituted “The applicant’s honesty” for “The applicant submits evidence as the board deems desirable with due regard to the paramount interests of the public regarding his honesty” in (a)(i); substituted “The applicant’s receipt of a doctoral degree” for “The applicant possesses a doctoral degree” in (a)(ii); rewrote (a)(iii),
which read: “The applicant demonstrates that he has completed two (2) years of supervised professional experience, one (1) year of which shall be predoctoral, and one (1) year of which shall be postdoctoral”; in (a)(iv), substituted “The applicant's successful completion of the examination” for “The applicant has passed the examination” and deleted “or the national school psychology examination” following “practice in psychology”; in (b), deleted “or school psychologist” following “if a psychologist” and substituted “in this state” for “in this jurisdiction”; in (c), inserted “or school psychologist” following “as a psychologist”, substituted “June 30, 2009” for “June 30, 1993”, and inserted “as a psychologist” following “renewal of licensure”; and added (e).

The 2022 amendment,

by ch. 46, §§ 2, 3, added “applicant's competence and of the” in the introductory language of (a); and repealed former (a)(i), which read, “The applicant’s honesty, truthfulness, integrity and competency.”

Laws 2022, ch. 47, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 9, 2022.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-27-113(a)(x).

Rejected applicant's course work not “primarily psychological.” —

Where the evidence showed the applicant had 20 hours of credit in psychology and psychology-related courses which represented roughly 30% of his total course work, the board was correct in finding applicant's doctoral program was not “primarily psychological” in nature and that this requirement was substantially different from the Illinois requirements under which he had been licensed. If the Wyoming board were to license the appellant based upon the law in Illinois, it would be tantamount to abdicating its authority to license applicants in Wyoming under Wyoming law. Sellers v. Wyoming Bd. of Psychologist Examiners, 739 P.2d 125,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 465

(Wyo. 1987) (decided under former § 33-27-106).

§ 33-27-118.
Limitation of practice.

The board shall ensure through rules and regulations and enforcement that those persons licensed or certified under this act limit their practice to demonstrated areas of competence.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 182, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-27-113(a)(x).

§ 33-27-119.
Practice without license.

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 154, § 2.

Unless exempt under W.S.

33-27-114

or

33-27-125

, any person who represents himself as a psychologist and who engages in the practice of psychology or represents himself as a behavior analyst or assistant behavior analyst and who engages in the practice of behavior analysis in violation of this act, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both. Each violation shall constitute a separate offense.

Any person filing or attempting to file as his own, a diploma or license of another or a forged affidavit of identification shall be guilty of a felony and shall be subject to the punishment prescribed for forgery under W.S.

6-3-602

.

Any person whose license to practice as a psychologist, behavior analyst or assistant behavior analyst in any jurisdiction has been suspended or revoked and which license has not been reinstated shall not practice psychology or behavior analysis in this state. The board may suspend or revoke the license of any person under this subsection and may issue a new license whenever it deems the issuance to be safe and just.

The board on its own motion may investigate any evidence or allegation that appears to show that any person is or may be in violation of any provision of this act.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 182, § 1; 2009, ch. 154, §§ 1, 2; 2018 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2022 ch. 47, § 2, effective March 9, 2022.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, repealed former (a), which read: “(a)
No person shall: (i)
Represent himself as a psychologist or school psychologist; or (ii)
Engage in the practice of psychology or school psychology as defined in this act unless exempted in W.S.

33-27-114

”; in the first sentence of (b), added “Unless exempt under W.S. 33 27 114,” at the beginning, substituted “and who engages” for “or school psychologist or who engages”, and deleted “or school psychology” following “the practice of psychology”; and in (d), deleted “or school psychologist” following “as a psychologist” and deleted “or school psychology” following “shall practice psychology.”

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (b), substituted “than” for “that” following “not more.”

The 2022 amendment,

in (b), in the first sentence, added “or

33-27-125

,” added “or represents himself as a behavior analyst or assistant behavior analyst and who engages in the practice of behavior analysis”; in (d), in the first sentence, substituted “Any” for “No” at the beginning, added “, behavior analyst or assistant behavior analyst,” added “and which license has not been reinstated,” added “not” preceding “practice psychology,” added “or behavior analysis,” substituted “any” for “that “in the second sentence, substituted “under this subsection and” for “The board” in the third sentence, and made a related change.

Laws 2022, ch. 47, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 9, 2022.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-27-113(a)(x).

Negligence.—

No private right of action existed for negligence claims alleging unauthorized practice of law and psychology, absent any indication in the statutory language that a violation would give rise to an action for damages or that a new tort duty was being created. Breen v. Pruter, 679 Fed. Appx. 713, 2017 U.S. App. LEXIS 2810 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2017).

§ 33-27-120.
Grounds for denial, suspension or revocation of license and other disciplinary sanctions.

A psychologist, behavior analyst or assistant behavior analyst and anyone under his supervision shall conduct his professional activities in conformity with ethical and professional standards as promulgated by rule of the board.

After notice and a hearing, the board may revoke, refuse to renew, reprimand, censure, limit the scope of practice, place on probation with or without terms, conditions or limitations or suspend licenses to practice psychology or behavior analysis for any of the following acts or offenses:

Fraud in applying for or procuring a license to practice psychology or behavior analysis;

Immoral, unprofessional or dishonorable conduct as defined in the rules and regulations promulgated by the board;

Practicing psychology or behavior analysis in a manner which endangers the welfare of clients or patients;

Conviction of a felony that interferes with the ability to practice psychology or behavior analysis as defined by rule of the board;

Conviction of any felony or conviction of any crime or offense that reflects the inability of the practitioner to practice with due regard for the health and safety of clients or patients. A copy of the conviction certified by the clerk of the court entering the conviction is conclusive evidence of the conviction;

Harassment, intimidation or abuse, sexual or otherwise, of a client or patient;

Sexual exploitation of a client or patient as defined by W.S. 33-27-113(a)(viii);

Use of untruthful or deceptive or improbable statements concerning the licensee’s qualifications or the effects or results of proposed treatment, including functioning outside of one’s professional competence established by education, training and experience;

Malpractice or negligence in the practice of psychology or behavior analysis;

Aiding or abetting the practice of psychology or behavior analysis by a person not licensed by the board;

Fraud in filing medicare or medicaid claims or in filing claims to any third party payor;

Exercising undue influence to exploit a client, patient, student or supervisee for financial or other personal advantage to the practitioner or a third party;

The suspension or revocation by another jurisdiction of a license to practice psychology or behavior analysis or the suspension or revocation of a behavior analysis certification issued by the certifying entity;

Refusal to appear before the board after having been ordered to do so in writing by the chair of the board;

Making any fraudulent or untrue statement to the board;

Violation of the code of ethics adopted in the rules and regulations of the board; or

Inability to practice psychology or behavior analysis with reasonable skill and safety to patients or clients by reason of illness, inebriation, misuse of drugs, narcotics, alcohol, chemicals or any other substance or as a result of any mental or physical condition.

With respect to evidence of any conviction or the suspension or revocation of a license for the purposes of subsection (b) of this section, a certified copy of the record of conviction from the court entering the conviction or from the state suspending or revoking the license shall be conclusive evidence thereof.

Upon receipt from the department of family services of a certified copy of an order from a court to withhold, suspend or otherwise restrict a license issued by the board, the board shall notify the party named in the court order of the withholding, suspension or restriction of the license in accordance with the terms of the court order. No appeal under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act shall be allowed for a license withheld, suspended or restricted under this subsection.

For purposes of this section, “conviction” means and includes a plea of guilty, nolo contendere and a verdict of guilty upon which a judgment of conviction may be rendered.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 182, § 1; 1997, ch. 128, § 2; 2009, ch. 154, § 1; 2022 ch. 47, § 2, effective March 9, 2022.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “or school psychologist” following “A psychologist” in (a); rewrote the introductory language of (b), which read: “The board may suspend, place on probation, require remediation for a specified time to be determined at the discretion of the board, restrict or revoke any license to practice psychology or school psychology, deny an application for licensure, or take any other action specified in the rules and regulations whenever the board shall find by a preponderance of the evidence, following a hearing conducted by the board pursuant to this act, that the psychologist, school psychologist or applicant has engaged in conduct prohibited by this act, rules or regulations promulgated by the board, or in any of the following acts or offenses”; deleted “or school psychology” from the end of (b)(i); deleted “or school psychology” following “Practicing psychology” in (b)(iii); deleted “or school psychology” following “to practice psychology” in (b)(iv); in (b)(v), substituted “Conviction of any felony” for “Conviction, including a plea of nolo contendere, to any felony” and substituted “conviction of any crime” for “conviction or plea of nolo contendere to any crime”; deleted “or school psychology” following “the practice of psychology” in (b)(ix); deleted “Conviction of” from the beginning of (b)(xi); deleted “or school psychology” from the end of (b)(xiii); deleted “or school psychology” following “to practice psychology” in (b)(xvii); and added (e).

The 2022 amendment,

in (a), added “, behavior analyst or assistant behavior analyst,” added “as” following “standards,” added “rule of,” deleted “under its rules and regulations” at the end; added “or behavior analysis” following “psychology” throughout (b); substituted “by rule of the board” for “in the rules and regulations” in (b)(iv); in (b)(xiii), substituted “jurisdiction” for “state” and added “or behavior analysis or the suspension or revocation of a behavior analysis certification issued by the certifying entity.”

Laws 2022, ch. 47, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 9, 2022.

§ 33-27-121.
Determination of mental or physical impairment.

If the board has reasonable grounds to suspect that a person licensed or certified under this act lacks the mental or physical capacity to practice with reasonable skill and safety to patients or clients, the board may require that person to submit to psychological, physical or other medical examinations to determine his capacity to practice competently. Failure or refusal to undergo requested examinations shall be grounds to suspend or revoke the license. The board shall specify in its rules and regulations the nature of the examinations, the appeal process, and who shall bear the cost of the examinations.

If the board has reasonable grounds to suspect that an applicant may be using controlled substances or is otherwise mentally or physically impaired, the board may require the applicant to undergo any psychological, physical or other examination necessary as specified in the rules and regulations to determine the applicant’s ability to competently practice.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 182, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-27-113(a)(x).